Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1567.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [62J.97] OFFICE OF PATIENT PROTECTION. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin The Office of Patient Protection is established to: new text end new text begin (1) assist consumers with issues related to access and quality of health care; and new text end new text begin (2) advise the legislature on ways to reduce consumer health care spending and improve consumer experiences by reducing complexity for consumers. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Director. new text end new text begin The governor shall appoint a director for the office. The director shall be in the unclassified service and shall serve at the pleasure of the governor. The director shall direct the office to fulfill its statutory responsibilities. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Organization. new text end new text begin The office shall consist of a director of the Office of Patient Protection as well as any staff necessary to carry out the office's responsibilities under subdivision 4. The office is a distinct entity, separately identifiable from other state agencies, and may not be engaged in the provision of health care or health insurance. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Responsibilities. new text end new text begin The office shall: new text end new text begin (1) establish and implement procedures to assist consumers aggrieved by restrictions on patient choice, denials of service, and reductions in quality of care resulting from any final action by a payer or provider; new text end new text begin (2) work with private sector and state agency consumer assistance programs to directly assist consumers with questions or concerns relating to public programs and private insurance coverage; new text end new text begin (3) collect information about health plan company quality of care and patient satisfaction information, and make information collected by the office reasonably accessible to consumers on the office's website; and new text end new text begin (4) report to the legislature by February 15 of each year on the work of the office in the previous calendar year and recommend any needed policy changes to improve consumer experiences by reducing complexity for consumers. new text end